New Jersey, session 221, A4353.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1999, c.153 (C.18A:40-3.3) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a.  A school district shall only utilize or employ for the provision of nursing services in the public schools of the district persons holding an educational services certificate with an endorsement as a school nurse issued by the State Board of Examiners, except for those non-nursing personnel who are otherwise authorized by statute or regulation to perform specific health related services.  Special education students and those with medical needs requiring specialized care shall have that care rendered by an appropriate provider as appointed by the State Board of Education.  No person shall be issued such certificate unless: the person is licensed as a registered nurse pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23 et seq.) or P.L.2019, c.172 (C.45:11A-9 et seq.); and meets all of the requirements prescribed by the board for a nursing endorsement. A school district may supplement the services provided by the certified school nurse with non-certified nurses, provided that the non-certified nurse is assigned to the same school building or school complex as the certified school nurse. b.    A medically fragile student requiring clinical nursing services shall have those services rendered by a provider of clinical nursing services as defined in this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude a licensed health care service firm that is approved to provide private duty nursing under the Medicaid Program and is in compliance with State Board of Education regulations.  The parent or legal guardian of a medically fragile student shall have the option to choose a provider to render clinical nursing services to the student, and the State Board of Education shall allow the provider chosen by the parent or legal guardian to render such services to the student only if the cost to the school district remains neutral. As used in this subsection: ["Medically fragile student" means a school-aged child who suffers from a life-threatening medical condition, and as a result of such condition, requires more individualized and continuous care than is available from a school nurse.] "Clinical nursing services" means specific health care services, based on a medically fragile student's individualized education plan and a physician's or advanced practice nurse's orders, as provided by a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse with specialized pediatric training who attends to the student. "Medically fragile student" means a school-aged child who suffers from a life-threatening medical condition, and as a result of such condition, requires more individualized and continuous care than is available from a school nurse. "Provider of clinical nursing services" means an agency that renders clinical nursing services and is approved to provide private duty nursing under the Medicaid program pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) or the NJ FamilyCare Program pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.). (cf: P.L.2012, c.5, s.2) 2.    Section 4 of P.L.1999, c.153 (C.18A:40-3.5) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The holder of a valid New Jersey registered nurse license or a multistate license issued pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2019, c.172 (C.45:11A-9 et seq.) may be issued a county substitute certificate to serve as a substitute for a certified school nurse in accordance with [N.J.A.C.6:11-4.5] regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education.  Emergency certificates may be issued in accordance with [N.J.A.C.6:11-4.3] regulations promulgated by the State board. (cf: P.L.1999, c.153, s.4) 3.    Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.70 (C.18A:40-3.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.    State Board of Education regulations prescribing the requirements for eligibility for an educational services certificate with a school nurse endorsement shall, at a minimum, require that a candidate for the endorsement: a.     is licensed as a registered nurse pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23 et seq.) or P.L.2019, c.172 (C.45:11A-9 et seq.); b.    holds a bachelor's degree from a regionally-accredited college or university; c.     completes either a Department of Education-approved college curriculum for the preparation of school nurses or a program of studies, with a minimum of 21 semester hour credits, that includes study in the fundamentals of substance abuse and dependency and such other subject areas as determined by the State board, and clinical experience in a school nurse office; and d.    completes a college-supervised school nurse practicum experience, a portion of which shall be completed in a school nurse office and a portion of which shall be completed in a classroom.  The practicum experience may count toward the minimum 21 semester hour credit requirement. (cf: P.L.2017, c.70, s.1) 4.    Section 2 of P.L.2017, c.70 (C.18A:40-3.8) is amended to read as follows: 2.    State Board of Education regulations prescribing the requirements for eligibility for an educational services certificate with a school nurse/non-instructional endorsement shall, at a minimum, require that a candidate for the endorsement: a.     is licensed as a registered nurse pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23 et seq.) or P.L.2019, c.172 (C.45:11A-9 et seq.); b.    holds a bachelor's degree from a regionally-accredited college or university; and c.     completes either a Department of Education-approved college curriculum for the preparation of school nurses or a program of studies, with a minimum of 15 semester hour credits, that includes study in the fundamentals of substance abuse and dependency and such other subject areas as determined by the State board, and clinical experience in a school nurse office. (cf: P.L.2017, c.70, s.2) 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.